Wisconsin, session 2025, SB610.
do enact as follows:SB610,1Section 1. 961.49 (1m) (e) of the statutes is created to read:961.49 (1m) (e) While the person is in a homeless shelter or while the person is on or within 1,000 feet of the premises of a homeless shelter if either the person knows or should have known that he or she is on or within 1,000 feet of the premises of a homeless shelter or the homeless shelter is readily recognizable as a homeless shelter.SB610,2Section 2. 961.49 (2m) of the statutes is amended to read:961.49 (2m) If any person violates s. 961.65 and, during the violation, the person intends to deliver or distribute methamphetamine or a controlled substance analog of methamphetamine under any of the circumstances listed under sub. (1m) (a), (b), (c), or (d), or (e), the maximum term of imprisonment for that crime is increased by 5 years. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb610 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb610 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB610 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB610 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB610: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting